Washington statutes.
RCW 40.24.010

Findings—Purpose—Intent.

The legislature finds that persons attempting to escape from actual or threatened domestic violence, sexual assault, trafficking, or stalking frequently establish new addresses in order to prevent their assailants or probable assailants from finding them. The purpose of this chapter is to enable state and local agencies to respond to requests for public records without disclosing the location of a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, trafficking, or stalking, to enable interagency cooperation with the secretary of state in providing address confidentiality for victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, trafficking, or stalking, and to enable state and local agencies to accept a program participant's use of an address designated by the secretary of state as a substitute mailing address. The legislature further intends to provide assistance to program participants who own or desire to own property in the state to protect such ownership from public disclosure.

[ 2019 c 122 s 1; 2008 c 312 s 1; 2001 c 28 s 1; 1998 c 138 s 1; 1991 c 23 s 1.]